Utah statutes.
32B-4-706.   Commercial bribery.

This section adopts and makes applicable to an industry member, including a beer industry member, doing business in this state, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 205(c) and 27 C.F.R. Sec. 10.1 through 10.54, which make it unlawful for an industry member, directly or indirectly, or through an affiliate, to induce a wholesaler or retailer engaged in the sale of an alcoholic product to purchase the industry member's products, to the complete or partial exclusion of alcoholic beverages sold or offered for sale by other persons, by commercial bribery, or by offering or giving a bonus, premium, compensation, or other thing of value, to any officer, employee, or representative of the wholesaler or retailer.

